Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-5] Illegal drug market target
community. A person who participates in the illegal drug market at a level
one, two, three, or four offense shall be considered to have participated in
the following illegal drug market target communities:

(1) For a level one offense, the area identified by
the tax map section in which the defendant’s place of participation is
situated;

(2) For a level two offense, the area identified by
the tax map zone in which the defendant’s place of participation is situated;

(3) For a level three offense, the county; provided
that in the case of Maui and Kauai counties, the target community shall be any
island in the respective county; and

(4) For a level four offense, the entire State. [L
2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next